Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-227
Authority; public members; terms; vacancies; removal.

Of the six public members first appointed to the authority, three shall be appointed to terms of office expiring on January 15, 1985, and the remaining three to terms of office expiring on January 15, 1987. All subsequent appointments shall be for terms of four years. Vacancies in the public membership of the authority shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the Governor. Each member shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her successor shall have been appointed and qualified. Any public member shall be eligible for reappointment. Any public member may be removed from office for incompetency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office by the Governor or by an affirmative vote by any six members of the authority.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 27.